Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.840

Computation of the retirement allowance.

(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final compensation for each service credit year.

(2) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.32.875 to a member who separates after having completed at least twenty service credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the date that the retirement allowance commences.

[ 1996 c 39 s 4; 1995 c 239 s 106.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.